Utah statutes.
40-8-18.   Notice of intention to revise operations -- Procedure.
(1) (a)  Since mining operations and related reclamation plans may need to be
revised to accommodate changing conditions or new technology, an operator
conducting mining operations under an approved notice of intention shall
submit to the division a notice of intention when revising mining operations.
(b)  The notice of intention to revise mining operations shall be submitted in
the form required by the rules promulgated by the board.
(2) (a)  The notice of intention to revise mining operations will be
designated as an amendment to the existing notice of intention by the
division, based on rules promulgated by the board.
(b)  An amendment of a notice of intention will be reviewed and considered for
approval or disapproval by the division within 30 days of receipt of a notice
of intention to revise mining operations.
(3) (a)  A notice of intention to revise mining operations, if not designated
as an amendment of a notice of intention as set forth in Subsection (2), shall
be processed and considered for approval by the division in the same manner
and within the same time period as an original notice of intention.
(b)  The operator shall be authorized and bound by the requirements of the
existing notice until the revision is acted upon and any revised surety
requirements are established and satisfied.
(4) (a)  If a change in the operation occurs, a mining operation
representative shall submit an amendment to the notice of intention.
(b)  Although approval of an amendment to the notice of intention by small
mining operations is not required, a revised surety shall be filed by the
permittee prior to implementing the amended notice of intention.
